Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-17] Exemption from taxation.
The authority shall not be required to pay assessments levied by any county,
nor shall the authority be required to pay state taxes of any kind. [L 1976, c
153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next